California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(c) It has been approved by handlers in a referendum among handlers that are directly affected. The director may make the finding pursuant to this subdivision if the valid votes cast in the referendum represent not less than 40 percent of the total number of handlers of the commodity of record with the department, and if the handlers that cast ballots in the referendum in favor of the marketing order or amendment to it represent not less than 65 percent of the total number of handlers that cast ballots in the referendum and handled not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the commodity which was marketed in the next preceding marketing season, or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete, by all of the handlers that cast ballots in the referendum, or if the handlers that cast ballots in the referendum in favor of the marketing order or amendment represent not less than 51 percent of the total number of handlers that cast ballots in the referendum and handled not less than 65 percent of the total quantity of the commodity which was handled in the next preceding marketing season, or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete, by all of the handlers who cast ballots in the referendum. The quantity of the commodity handled by the handler may be stated on the referendum ballot returned by each handler or may be obtained by requiring handlers to report that volume pursuant to Section 58775.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

58992.

Any marketing order or major amendment to it which directly affects processors that are engaged in the operation of canning of fresh fruits or vegetables or canning or packing of dried fruits shall not be made effective by the director unless and until the director finds one of the following has occurred:

(a) The marketing order or amendment to it has been assented to in writing by the processors that are engaged in the marketing activity which is regulated by the marketing order or amendment to it that processed not less than 65 percent of the volume of the commodity which is processed within the area defined in the marketing order or amendment to it and by 65 percent of the number of the processors that are engaged in the marketing activity which is regulated by the marketing order or amendment to it.

(b) It has been approved by processors in a referendum among processors that are directly affected. The director may make the finding pursuant to this subdivision if the valid votes cast in the referendum represent not less that 40 percent of the total number of processors of the commodity of record with the department, and if the processors that cast ballots in the referendum in favor of the marketing order or amendment to it represent not less than 65 percent of the total number of processors that cast ballots in the referendum and processed not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the commodity which was marketed in the next preceding marketing season, or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to processors is complete, by all of the processors that cast ballots in the referendum, or if the processors that cast ballots in the referendum in favor of the marketing order or amendment represent not less than 51 percent of the total number of processors that cast ballots in the referendum and processed not less than 65 percent of the total quantity of the commodity which was marketed in the next preceding marketing season or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to processors is complete, by all of the processors who cast ballots in the referendum. The quantity of the commodity processed by the processor may be stated on the referendum ballot returned by each processor or may be obtained by requiring processors to report that volume pursuant to Section 58775.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

58993.

No marketing order or major amendment to it, which directly affects producers or producer marketing, that is issued pursuant to this chapter, shall be made effective by the director unless and until the director finds one or more of the following has occurred:

(a) It has been assented to in writing by not less than 65 percent of the producers that are engaged, within the area specified in the marketing order or amendment to it, in the production for market, or engaged in the producer marketing, of not less than 51 percent of the commodity which is specified in the marketing order or the amendment to the marketing order in commercial quantities.

(b) It has been assented to in writing by producers that produce not less than 65 percent of the volume of the commodity and by 51 percent of the total number of producers that are so engaged.

(c) It has been approved by producers in a referendum among producers that are directly affected. The director may make the finding if the valid votes cast in the referendum represent not less than 40 percent of the total number of producers of the commodity of record with the department, and if the producers that cast ballots in the referendum in favor of the marketing order or amendment to it represent not less than 65 percent of the total number of producers that cast ballots in the referendum and marketed not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the commodity which was marketed in the next preceding marketing season, or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete, by all of the producers that cast ballots in the referendum or if the producers that cast ballots in the referendum in favor of the marketing order or amendment represent not less than 51 percent of the total number of producers that cast ballots in the referendum and marketed not less than 65 percent of the total quantity of the commodity which was marketed in the next preceding marketing season, or the current marketing season if the harvest and delivery of the commodity to handlers is complete, by all of the producers who cast ballots in the referendum. The quantity of the commodity delivered by the producer may be stated on the referendum ballot returned by each producer or may be obtained by requiring handlers to report that volume pursuant to Section 58775.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

58994.

If any marketing order or any major amendment to any marketing order is issued by the director for the approval of producers, handlers, or processors, the director shall determine whether the approval shall be by written assents or by referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

58995.

If the director determines that it should be by referendum, the director shall establish a referendum period not to exceed 30 days. If the director determines that the referendum period so established does not provide sufficient time for the balloting, the director may extend the referendum period not more than 15 additional days. At the close of the referendum period, the director shall count and tabulate the ballots filed during the referendum period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

58996.

If from the tabulation the director finds that the number of producers that voted in the referendum and that the number of producers that voted in favor of the marketing order or amendment to the marketing order are sufficient for him to make the finding that producers that are directly affected have approved the marketing order or amendment, the director may make the marketing order or amendment to the marketing order effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58997.

If the director finds from the tabulation of such referendum that the number of producers that voted in favor of such marketing order or amendment to the marketing order is not sufficient for him to make the finding that producers that are directly affected have approved the marketing order or amendment to it, he shall not make the marketing order or amendment effective.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58998.

The director may prescribe such additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

58999.

In finding whether the marketing order or major amendment to it is assented to in writing or approved or favored by producers pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the director shall consider the approval of any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association, which is authorized by its members so to assent, as being the assent, approval, or favor of the producers that are members of, or stockholders in, that nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 677, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

59000.

Any producer that sells a growing crop to be harvested and marketed by another person is entitled to assent to, or vote in a referendum, if both of the following requirements are complied with:

(a) At the time of sale of such growing crop the producer retains the exclusive right so to assent or to so vote.

(b) The quantity of such growing crop can be determined to the satisfaction of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Major Amendments [59021. - 59037.]

59021.

In making effective major amendments to a marketing order, the director shall follow the same procedures which are prescribed in this chapter for the institution of a marketing order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59022.

For the purposes of this chapter, a major amendment to a marketing order shall include, but not be limited to, any amendment which is specified in Sections 59023 to 59035, inclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59023.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for any of the following:

(a) Determining the existence and extent of the surplus of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it.

(b) Providing for the control and disposition of such surplus and for equalizing the burden of such surplus elimination.

(c) The establishment of a stabilization fund for equalizing surplus obligations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59024.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for limiting the total quantity of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which may be prepared for market or marketed within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59025.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for allotting the quantity of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which any handler may purchase or acquire from or handle on behalf of any and all producers of such commodity within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59026.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for allotting the quantity of any commodity, or of any grade, size, or quality of it, which any handler may process, distribute, or handle within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59027.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for regulating the period during which any commodity, or any grade, size, or quality of such commodity, may be processed, distributed, or otherwise marketed within this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59028.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for the establishment of surplus, stabilization, or byproduct pools for any commodity, or of any grade, size, quality, or condition of it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59029.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for the establishment of uniform grading and inspection of any commodity and the establishment of grading standards of quality, condition, size, or pack of such commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59030.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for the establishment of plans for advertising and sales promotion of any commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59031.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority to prohibit unfair trade practices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59032.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for the establishment of production adjustment requirements and benefit payments which relate to them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59033.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority for carrying out research studies in the production, processing, or distribution of any commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59034.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority to increase an assessment rate beyond the maximum rate which is authorized by the marketing order then in effect.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59035.

An amendment is a major amendment if it adds to, or deletes from, a marketing order authority to extend the application of the provisions of any marketing order to portions or uses of a commodity not previously subject to such provisions or to restrict or extend the application of such provisions upon the producers or handlers of such portions or uses of any such commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59036.

Modification of any provision of any marketing order in effect for the purpose of clarifying the meaning or application of such provision or modifying administrative procedures for carrying out such provision is not a major amendment of such marketing order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59037.

The exercise by the director of any regulatory authority which is authorized in a marketing order or marketing agreement is not a major amendment, but is a seasonal marketing regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Minor Amendments [59051. - 59052.]

59051.

The director may make minor amendments to any marketing order upon the recommendation of not less than 75 percent of the producer members or handler members of the advisory board, or not less than 75 percent of each group if both are represented upon the advisory board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59052.

The director may require a public hearing upon minor amendments if in his opinion the substance of such minor amendments so warrant. The director is not, however, required to submit minor amendments for written assents or referendum approval.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Termination or Suspension [59081. - 59088.]

59081.

The director shall suspend or terminate any marketing order, if he finds, after a public hearing duly noticed and held in accordance with the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 58771) of this chapter, that such marketing order is contrary to, or does not tend to effectuate, the declared purposes or provisions of this chapter within the standards and subject to the limitations and restrictions which are imposed in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59082.

The director shall terminate any marketing order if he finds that the termination of the marketing order is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the producers that are directly affected that produce at least 51 percent of the volume of the product, or by at least 51 percent of the handlers that are directly affected that handle at least 51 percent of the volume of the product.

The person or persons originating such a written request shall file a written notice with the director in such a manner that the date such a request is initiated can be readily ascertained. Any such person may withdraw his name from such a written request until the time the request is presented to the director.

A request to terminate a marketing order shall be submitted to the director by a petition signed by not less than the number of producers or handlers which produce or handle the volume of products specified in this section. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add to his signature his place of business, giving street and number. If no street and number exist, then a designation of the place of business shall be given which will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

Before circulating a petition to terminate a marketing order, its proponents shall notify the director of their intent to do so in order to ascertain the beginning date of the 90-day period.

After such notification to the director, the petition may be circulated among the producers or handlers affected. The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section. Any person may withdraw his name from a petition to terminate any marketing order until the time the petition is presented to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

59083.

If at least 25 percent of the producers that are directly affected that produce at least 25 percent of the product and at least 25 percent of the handlers that are directly affected that handle at least 25 percent of the product request, within a 90-day period, that such marketing order be submitted to reapproval, the director shall hold a hearing on the question of the reapproval of such marketing order, and whether such reapproval shall be by assent or referendum.

If the director finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists as to whether such marketing order is contrary to, or does not effectuate the declared purposes or provisions of, this chapter within the standards and subject to the limitations and restrictions which are imposed in this chapter, such marketing order shall be submitted for the reapproval of those producers and handlers that are directly affected, as provided in this article, within 120 days of the receipt of the original request.

The person or persons originating such a request shall file a written notice with the director in such a manner that the date such a request is initiated can be readily ascertained. Persons may withdraw their names from such a request until the time the request is presented to the director.

A request to hold a public hearing on a marketing order shall be submitted to the director by a petition signed by not less than the number of producers or handlers which produce or handle the volume of products specified in this section. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add to his signature his place of business, giving street and number. If no street and number exist, then a designation of the place of business shall be given which will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

Before circulating a petition to hold a public hearing on a marketing order, its proponents shall notify the director of their intent to do so in order to ascertain the beginning date of the 90-day period.

After such notification to the director, the petition may be circulated among the producers or handlers affected. The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section. Any person may withdraw his name from a petition to hold a public hearing on any marketing order until the time the petition is presented to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 644.)
-------------------------------------------

59084.

If the director finds that the marketing order is not reapproved, he shall declare such order terminated. An order shall be considered reapproved if it has been assented to or favored at a referendum in the same manner as is required for a new marketing order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59085.

At any time the director finds that a substantial number of persons that are directly affected by an order are in opposition to it, he shall hold a hearing on the question of the termination, suspension, amendment, or reapproval of such order, and shall, not more than 60 days after such hearing, terminate, suspend, or submit for amendment or reapproval such order, or make a finding that there is not sufficient opposition to the order to warrant any action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59086.

A marketing order shall not be submitted for reapproval until one year after the original enactment, or within one year of any prior approval. However, if no provision is made in any marketing order for reapproval or for termination in less than five years, the director shall at least once each five years hold a hearing, duly noticed and held in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the director finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists as to whether such marketing order is contrary to, or does not effectuate the declared purposes or provisions of this chapter within the standards and subject to the limitations and restrictions which are imposed in this chapter, such marketing order shall be submitted for reapproval. The vote for reapproval shall be the same as used for original approval of a marketing order. The director shall determine whether such approval shall be by assent or referendum. An amendment to a marketing order which extends the term thereof shall be deemed a reapproval of the marketing order. A marketing order which within five years prior to the effective date of this act has been amended to fix or extend its term shall be deemed to have been duly reapproved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1372.)
-------------------------------------------

59087.

(a) The secretary may terminate, without a public hearing, any marketing order or marketing agreement that has been inoperative for three consecutive marketing seasons after giving notice of intent to terminate the marketing order or marketing agreement pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) The notice shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site. Termination shall not become effective until five days after the date of the posting. The secretary shall also issue, at the time of the posting, a public notice to newspapers of general and statewide circulation concerning the secretary’s intention to terminate the marketing order or
 marketing agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 223, Sec. 2.   (AB 3260)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

59088.

No suspension or termination of any marketing order or marketing agreement pursuant to this article shall become effective until the expiration of the marketing season then current.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Publication of Notice [59111. - 59111.]

59111.

(a) Upon the issuance of any order that makes effective a marketing order or marketing agreement, or any suspension, amendment, or termination of a marketing order or marketing agreement, a notice of the issuance shall be posted on the department’s Internet Web site. A marketing order or marketing agreement, or any suspension, amendment, or termination of it, shall not become effective until five days after the date of the posting. The secretary shall also mail a copy of the notice to every person that is directly affected by the terms of the marketing order or marketing agreement, or the suspension, amendment, or termination of the marketing order or marketing agreement, whose name and address are on
 file in the office of the secretary, and to every person that files in the office of the secretary a written request for the notice.

(b) This section does not apply to the termination of any marketing order or marketing agreement under Section 59087.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 223, Sec. 3.   (AB 3260)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. General Rules and Regulations [59141. - 59142.]

59141.

The director may establish such general rules and regulations for uniform application to all marketing orders and marketing agreements which are issued pursuant to this chapter as may be necessary to facilitate the administration and enforcement of such marketing orders and agreements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59142.

The provisions of Article 16 (commencing with Section 59111) of this chapter relative to posting and time of taking effect are applicable to any general rule and regulation which is established pursuant to this article and applicable to marketing orders generally. Such notice shall be mailed to the advisory board for each marketing order or marketing agreement which is in active operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Administrative Rules and Regulations [59161. - 59163.]

59161.

Upon recommendation of the advisory board which is concerned, the director may, without prior notice and hearing, establish administrative rules and regulations for each marketing order or marketing agreement which is issued and made effective as may be necessary to facilitate the administration and enforcement of each such order or agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59162.

Such rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, any of the following:

(a) Methods and procedures for the purpose of explaining or clarifying the provisions of such marketing order or agreement.

(b) Prescribing reporting forms and procedures to be followed by producers and handlers that are directly affected by such marketing order or agreement.

(c) Providing information to producers and handlers that are subject to such marketing order or agreement.

(d) Other similar procedural and explanatory provisions to enable such producers and handlers better to understand the program and their respective obligations under it and thereby assist in obtaining cooperation and compliance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59163.

The provisions of Article 16 (commencing with Section 59111) of this chapter relative to posting, mailing of notice, and time of taking effect are applicable to any such administrative rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 871.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 19. Seasonal Marketing Regulations [59171. - 59176.]

59171.

Upon recommendation of the advisory board which is concerned, the director may, without prior notice to, and public hearing for, the producers or handlers of the commodity which is directly affected, issue and make effective seasonal marketing regulations or modifications of such regulations if all of the following requirements are complied with:

(a) The marketing order, or agreement concerned provides for the issuance or modification of such seasonal marketing regulations without requiring such prior notice and public hearing and sets forth the limits within which such seasonal marketing regulations may be made effective or subsequently modified by the director.

(b) The director finds that such seasonal marketing regulations or modifications of them are reasonable and proper and a practical means of carrying out the marketing provisions which are authorized in such marketing order or agreement and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes and policies of the chapter with respect to such commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59172.

Seasonal marketing regulations shall be applicable to a particular marketing order or agreement for the purpose of carrying into effect by administrative order, the marketing regulatory authorizations and provisions of such marketing order or agreement as such authorizations or provisions may be applicable to, or required by, changing economic or marketing conditions and requirements, from time to time, during each marketing season in which such marketing order or agreement may operate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59173.

Seasonal marketing regulations shall not extend beyond the marketing regulatory authorizations which are specified in the marketing order or agreement concerned, or modify or change the language of such marketing order or marketing agreement by adding to, or subtracting from, such marketing order or agreement any of the marketing regulatory authorizations which are classed in Article 13 (commencing with Section 59021) of this chapter as major amendments, or modify the language of any marketing order or agreement for the purpose of clarification as provided in Article 14 (commencing with Section 59051) of this chapter for minor amendments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59174.

Notice of the issuance and the effective date of any such seasonal marketing regulations, or modifications of them, shall be given by the director to all producers and handlers that are directly affected by any such regulations in the manner and within the time which is specified in the applicable marketing order or agreement, or as specified in the administrative rules and regulations which are made effective for such marketing order or agreement pursuant to Article 18 (commencing with Section 59161) of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59175.

It is recognized that, with respect to some commodities, marketing, weather, and other conditions may change so rapidly as to require changes in seasonal marketing regulations from week to week or oftener.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59176.

It is intended that the provisions of this article be interpreted liberally so that the director may carry out the marketing regulations and procedures authorized in this article in a practical and effective manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Records [59201. - 59204.]

59201.

The director may require any and all processors or distributors, that are subject to the provisions of any marketing order which is issued pursuant to this chapter, to maintain books and records which reflect their operations under such marketing order, and to furnish him with such information as may be from time to time requested by him which relates to operations under such marketing order, and to permit the inspection by the director of such portions of such books and records as relate to operations under such marketing order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59202.

Information which is obtained by any person pursuant to this article is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any other person except to a person with like right to obtain the information, or any attorney who is employed to give legal advice upon it, or by court order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59203.

For the purpose of carrying out the purposes of this article, the director may hold hearings, take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records, or documents of any kind.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59204.

A person shall not be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing documentary evidence, before the director in obedience to the subpoena of the director on the ground, or for the reason, that the testimony or evidence, documentary, or otherwise, which is required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture. A natural person shall not, however, be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for, or on account of, any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he may be so required to testify, or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the director in obedience to a subpoena which is issued by him.

A natural person so testifying is not, however, exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Actions and Penalties [59231. - 59252.]

59231.

Any action for any penalty or other remedy which is prescribed under any provision of this chapter shall be commenced within three years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1222.)
-------------------------------------------

59232.

The penalties, remedies, procedures, and actions which are prescribed by this article apply in instances of any violation or complaint of any violation of any provision of this chapter, any marketing order, or any regulation, or rule and regulation, which is issued by the director pursuant to this chapter or pursuant to any marketing order which is issued under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59233.

Every person that violates any provision of this chapter or any provision of any marketing order which is duly issued by the director pursuant to this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment of not less than 10 days nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each violation during any day constitutes a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 126.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

59234.

Any person that violates this chapter or any marketing order which is duly issued by the director and in effect pursuant to this chapter, or violates any rule or regulation which is issued by the director pursuant to this chapter or the marketing order, is liable civilly in an amount of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each and every violation. Each violation during any day is a separate offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

59234.5.

(a) When the director makes a determination that a marketing program assessment payment due pursuant to this chapter is deficient as to the payment due, the director may determine the amount of the deficiency, including any applicable penalty, as provided in this section. After giving notice that a deficiency determination is proposed and an opportunity to file a report or provide supplemental information is provided, the director may make one or more deficiency determinations of the amount due for any reporting period based on information in the director’s possession. When a business is discontinued, a deficiency determination may be made at any time thereafter as to liability arising out of the operation of that business.

The director shall give notice of the proposed deficiency determination and the notice of deficiency determination by placing the notice thereof in a sealed envelope with postage paid addressed to the person affected as it appears in the records of the marketing order or as otherwise available to the director. The giving of notice is complete at the time of deposit in the United States mail. In lieu of mailing, a notice may be served personally by delivering it to the person to be served.

Except in the case of fraud or failure to file a required return, a notice of a deficiency determination shall be given within four years of the accrual of the deficiency.

(b) The person against whom a deficiency determination is made may petition the director for redetermination within 30 days after the serving of the notice of deficiency determination. If a petition is not filed within 30 days, the deficiency determination shall become final.

A petition for redetermination shall be in writing, state the specific grounds upon which it is based, and be supported by applicable records and declarations under penalty of perjury that the information supporting the petition is accurate and complete. If a petition for redetermination is duly filed, the director shall reconsider the deficiency determination and may grant a hearing thereon. The director shall, as soon as practicable, make an order on redetermination, which shall become final 30 days after service of notice of the order of redetermination upon the petitioner. The notice of the order shall be served in the same manner as the notice of the original deficiency determination.

(c) If any amount required to be paid pursuant to a deficiency determination or redetermination is not paid within the time specified in the notice thereof, the director may, within four years thereafter, file in the Superior Court for the County of Sacramento, or the superior court of any other county, a certificate specifying the amount required to be paid, the name and address of the person liable as it appears on the records of the director, and a request that judgment be entered against the person in that amount 30 days after the filing. Notice of the filing shall be given in the same manner as for the notice of deficiency determination. The court shall enter a judgment in conformance with the director’s certificate 30 days after its filing, unless a petition for judicial review has been filed within the 30-day period.
